Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.090

Discontinuance of fees.

The collection of the fees directed in RCW 27.24.070 shall be discontinued whenever the board of trustees of a county library or the prosecuting attorney, as the case may be, files with the county clerk and clerks of the district courts a written resolution to the effect that the county library fund in its county is sufficient for all present needs, which resolution shall remain effective until it is later rescinded. Upon its rescission, the county clerk and clerks of the district courts shall resume the collection of such fees.

[ 1987 c 202 s 188; 1975 c 37 s 2; 1953 c 249 s 3; 1933 c 167 s 2, part; 1925 ex.s. c 94 s 3, part; RRS s 8254-3, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.